Hawaii statutes.
[§5-7.6] Aloha order of merit. (a)
There is established the Aloha order of merit, within the office of the
governor for administrative purposes, to honor individuals selected under this
section. Individuals conferred the lifetime title of "member of the Aloha
order of merit" shall be inducted into the order by the governor after
receiving the approval of the legislature by concurrent resolution. Honorees
shall have:

(1) Achieved national or international recognition in
their field either by a single event or by the totality of their work that has
been either pioneering in their field or that has been outstanding in the
long-term; and

(2) (A) Contributed to the attainment of
statehood for Hawaii;

(B) Devoted themselves to the betterment of
the State, embodying the concept of the Aloha Spirit;

(C) Provided extraordinary service to the
State; or

(D) Brought honor to the State.

(b) Honorees shall be selected by an Aloha
order of merit committee. The committee shall consist of three members. Each
member shall serve for a term of two years. One member of the committee shall
be a member of the senate appointed by the president of the senate, one member
of the committee shall be a member of the house of representatives appointed by
the speaker of the house of representatives, and one member of the committee
shall be appointed by the governor.

(c) Nominations for honorees shall be accepted
by the committee from members of the legislature, the governor, and the general
public. Nominations shall be in the form and manner prescribed by the office
of the governor. The committee shall establish criteria for selection and
induction to ensure and maintain the prestige of the order. The committee may
select or choose not to select any individual from the nominations received in
any given year.

(d) Upon induction or as soon thereafter as
may be necessary, the governor may award appropriate mementos to members of the
order.

(e) The governor may request a member of the
order to serve as an emissary for the people of Hawaii on appropriate
occasions. [L 1993, c 231, §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next